District of Columbia statutes.
11-1901

Declaration of policy.

A jury selection system is hereby established for the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. All litigants entitled to trial by jury shall have the right to grand and petit juries selected at random from a fair cross section of the residents of the District of Columbia. In accordance with the provisions of this chapter, all qualified individuals shall have the opportunity to be considered for service on grand and petit juries in the District of Columbia and shall be obligated to serve as jurors when summoned for that purpose.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
This section is referenced in § 11-1908.
1981 Ed., § 11-1901.
Short title: Section 1 of Public Law 99-650 provided: “This Act may be cited as the ‘District of Columbia Jury System Act’.”
Board of Judges to have authority to promulgate and adopt plan: See § 4(b) of P.L. 99-650.